Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.451

Grain indemnity fund program—Payment limitations.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 22.09.456 and 22.09.461 and to a maximum payment of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars on all claims against a single licensee, approved claims against a licensed warehouse operator or licensed grain dealer shall be paid from the grain indemnity fund in the following amounts:

(1) Approved claims against a licensed warehouse operator shall be paid in full;

(2) Approved claims against a licensed grain dealer for payments due within thirty days of transfer of title shall be paid in full for the first twenty-five thousand dollars of the claim. The amount of such a claim in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars shall be paid to the extent of eighty percent;

(3) Approved claims against a licensed grain dealer for payments due between thirty and ninety days of transfer of title shall be paid to the extent of eighty percent;

(4) Approved claims against a licensed grain dealer for payments due after ninety days from transfer of title shall be paid to the extent of seventy-five percent;

(5) In the event that approved claims against a single licensee exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, recovery on those claims shall be prorated.

[ 2011 c 336 s 633; 1987 c 509 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.